Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2153
Act; cumulative.

The powers, remedies, procedures, and penalties provided in the Insurance Holding Company System Act shall be in addition to, and not in limitation of, any other powers, remedies, procedures, and penalties provided by law.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 33.

The director of the Department of Insurance should not be impeded in choices of remedy and protective measures by the enumerated powers of the Insurance Holding Company System Act. The importance of the director's duties as a watchdog for policyholders, and the fact that the director is the only watchdog whose authority can bind domestic insurers, counsel in favor of a broad construction of the Insurance Holding Company System Act and the remedies provided therein. CenTra, Inc. v. Chandler Ins. Co., 248 Neb. 844, 540 N.W.2d 318 (1995).